California, session 20252026, AB2149.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 6.4 (commencing with Section 52110) is added to Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 6.4. Closing the Achievement Gap Accountability Report52110. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before December 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall, as a component of the assessment of the state budget, assess and publicly report to the Legislature and the Governor the state’s progress in closing pupil academic achievement gaps and shall include recommendations on actions that the state can take to meet its specific goals and benchmarks to support local educational agencies in closing the achievement gap established pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 52090, added by Assembly Bill 2225 of the 2025–26 Regular Session.(2) To meet the requirements of paragraph (1), the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) A review and assessment of whether the prior year’s adopted budget aligns with the Closing the Achievement Gap State Operations and Support Plan developed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 52090, added by Assembly Bill 2225 of the 2025–26 Regular Session.(B) An assessment of new and existing unfunded or partially funded mandates or state requirements on local educational agencies and whether those mandates and requirements contribute to, or interfere with, local educational agencies’ ability to close the achievement gap, including whether those mandates and requirements align with the Closing the Achievement Gap State Operations and Support Plan.(C) An evaluation of state support efforts and the efficacy of state-run and state-directed programs aimed at improving pupil outcomes and closing the achievement gap.(D) Any barriers that local educational agencies face in closing the achievement gap.(3) A report required by paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(b) The Legislative Analyst’s Office shall consult with education stakeholders to develop each annual report required pursuant to subdivision (a).SEC. 2. This bill would become operative only if Assembly Bill 2225 of the 2025–26 Regular Session is enacted and takes effect on or before January 1, 2027, and adds Section 52090 to the Education Code.